Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
12 SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
13 codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
14 This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Retirement Act
15 of 2025".
16 SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
17
18 60-1-10295 CMA 12/30/24
19
20
21
22
23
24
Req. No. 10295 Page 1

THOMAS E. CUMMINS CONSULTING ACTUARY, INC.
2512 E. 71st Street , Suite D ∙ Tulsa, Oklahoma 74136
(918) 492-9658 ∙ (918) 492- 9659
January 2, 2025
Representative Lepak
Room 453N
Re: RBH No. 10295
RBH No. 10295 is a shell bill.
RBH No. 10295 is a non fiscal bill as defined by OPLAAA.
I am a member of the American Academy of Actuaries and meet the
Qualification Standards of the American Academy of Actuaries to
render the actuarial opinion herein.
Thomas E. Cummins
Thomas E. Cummins, MAAA